Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Rates

§ 77-9-371.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 72, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

[Codes, 1892, § 4287; 1906, § 4839; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7624; 1930, § 7091; 1942, § 7867]

§ 77-9-373.
Civil damages recoverable from railroad guilty of extortion.

A party injured may recover of a railroad corporation or the person managing a railroad who is guilty of extortion as defined in Section 77-9-371, twice the amount of damages sustained by the overcharge or discrimination, as the case may be.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4288; 1906, § 4840; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7625; 1930, § 7092; 1942, § 7868.

§ 77-9-375.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 460, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

[Codes, 1892, § 4289; 1906, § 4841; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7626; 1930, § 7093; 1942, § 7869]

§§ 77-9-377 and 77-9-379.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 512, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§77-9-377. [Codes, 1892, § 4292; 1906, § 4844; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7629; 1930, § 7097; 1942, § 7873; Laws, 1916, ch. 233]

§77-9-379. [Codes, 1892, § 4293; 1906, § 4845; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7630; 1930, § 7098; 1942, § 7874]

§§ 77-9-381 through 77-9-387.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 460, § 18-21, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§77-9-381. [Codes, 1892, § 4294; 1906, § 4846; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7631; 1930, § 7099; 1942, § 7875]

§77-9-383. [Codes, 1892, § 4295; 1906, § 4847; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7632; 1930, § 7100; 1942, § 7876]

§77-9-385. [Codes, 1892, § 4318; 1906, § 4872; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7657; 1930, § 7103; 1942, § 7879]

§77-9-387. [Codes, 1892, § 4297; 1906, § 4849; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7634; 1930, § 7102; 1942, § 7878]